Vermont, session 2025-2026, H529.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 7555 is amended to read:
§ 7555. PRETRIAL SUPERVISION PROGRAM
(a) Purpose. The purpose of the Pretrial Supervision Program is to assist
eligible people persons through the use of evidence-based strategies to improve
pretrial compliance with conditions of release, to coordinate and support the
provision of pretrial services when appropriate, to ensure attendance at court
appearances, and to decrease the potential to recidivate while awaiting trial.
(b) Definition. As used in this section, “absconded” has the same meaning
as “absconding” as defined in 28 V.S.A. § 722(1)(B)–(C) 722(1)(B) and (C).
VT LEG #385253 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.529
2026 Page 2 of 6
(c) Pretrial supervision.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, beginning on
January 1, 2025, the Pretrial Supervision Program shall, if ordered by the court
pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, monitor defendants who have been
charged with violating a condition of release pursuant to section 7559 of this
title or have not fewer than five pending dockets and pose a risk of
nonappearance at court hearings, a risk of flight, or a risk of endangering the
public.
(2) The Department shall assign a pretrial supervision officer to monitor
defendants in a designated region of Vermont and help coordinate any pretrial
services needed by the defendant. The Department shall determine the
appropriate level of supervision using evidence-based screenings of those
defendants eligible to be placed in the Program. The Department’s supervision
levels may include use of:
(A) the Department’s telephone monitoring system;
(B) telephonic meetings with a pretrial supervision officer;
(C) in-person meetings with a pretrial supervision officer;
(D) electronic monitoring; or
(E) any other means of contact deemed appropriate.
(3) When placing a defendant into the Program pursuant to subsection
(d) of this section, the court shall issue an order that sets the defendant’s level
VT LEG #385253 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.529
2026 Page 3 of 6
of supervision based on the recommendations submitted by the Department of
Corrections.
(d) Procedure.
(1) At arraignment or at a subsequent hearing, the prosecutor or the
defendant may move, or on the court’s own motion, that the defendant be
reviewed by the court to determine whether the defendant is appropriate for
pretrial supervision. The review shall be scheduled upon the court’s receipt of
a report from the Department of Corrections containing recommendations
pertaining to the defendant’s supervision level.
(2) A defendant is eligible for pretrial supervision if the person has:
(A) violated conditions of release pursuant to section 7559 of this
title; or
(B) not fewer than five pending court dockets.
(3) After a hearing and review of the Department of Corrections’ report
containing the defendant’s supervision level recommendations, the court may
order that the defendant be released to the Pretrial Supervision Program,
provided that the court finds placing the defendant under pretrial supervision
will reasonably ensure the person’s appearance in court when required, will
reasonably mitigate the risk of flight, or reasonably ensure protection of the
public. In making such a determination, the court shall consider the following:
VT LEG #385253 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.529
2026 Page 4 of 6
(A) the nature of the violation of conditions of release pursuant to
section 7559 of this title;
(B) the nature and circumstances of the underlying offense or
offenses with which the defendant is charged;
(C) the defendant’s prior convictions, history of violence, medical
and mental health needs, history of supervision, and risk of flight;
(D) any risk or undue burden to third parties or risk to public safety
that may result from the placement; or
(E) any other factors that the court deems appropriate.
(e) Compliance and review.
(1) Pretrial supervision officers shall notify the prosecutor and use
reasonable efforts to notify the defendant of any violations of court-imposed
Program conditions committed by the defendant.
(2) Pretrial supervision officers may notify the prosecutor and use
reasonable efforts to notify the defendant of any violations of Department-
imposed administrative conditions committed by the defendant.
(3)(A) Upon the motion of the prosecutor or the defendant, or on the
court’s own motion, a defendant’s compliance with pretrial supervision
conditions may be reviewed by the court.
VT LEG #385253 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.529
2026 Page 5 of 6
(B) Pretrial supervision officers may file a motion to review pretrial
supervision conditions for a violation of court-imposed Program conditions
committed by the defendant.
(4) Upon submission of the pretrial supervision officer’s sworn affidavit
by the prosecutor, the court may issue a warrant for the arrest of a defendant
who fails to report to the pretrial supervision officer, commits multiple
violations of supervision requirements, or has absconded.
(f) Policies and procedures.
(1) On or before November 1, 2024, the Department of Corrections shall
establish written policies and procedures for the Pretrial Supervision Program
to be used by the Department and any contractors or grantees that the
Department engages with to assist in the monitoring operations of the Program
and to assist the courts in understanding the Program.
(2) The Department shall develop policies and procedures concerning
supervision levels, evidence-based criteria for each supervision level, and the
means of contact that is appropriate for each supervision level.
(g) Contingent on funding. The Pretrial Supervision Program established
in this section shall operate only to the extent funds are appropriated for its
operation. If the Program is not operating in a particular county, the courts
shall not order pretrial supervision as a condition of release in accordance with
section 7554 of this title.
VT LEG #385253 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.529
2026 Page 6 of 6
(h) Program support. The Department may support the operation of the
Program through grants of financial assistance to, or contracts for services
with, any public entity that meets the Department’s requirements.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385253 v.1